New York, session 2025-2026, A4186.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "roadside 2 cannabis advertising prohibition act". 3 § 2. The cannabis law is amended by adding a new section 86-a to read 4 as follows: 5 § 86-a. Prohibition of roadside signage for the sale of cannabis. 1. 6 No person, business entity, or governmental entity shall erect or main- 7 tain any sign or billboard that advertises the sale of cannabis or 8 cannabis products, as defined in this article, on a highway, road, or 9 other vehicular pathway within the state. 10 2. This prohibition shall not apply to signs or billboards that iden- 11 tify an authorized retailer and are located on the premises of that 12 business which is legally allowed to sell cannabis or cannabis products, 13 so long as the signage only identifies the business. Cannabis product 14 signage should only be affixed to a building and not readable on the 15 highway, road, or other vehicular pathway. 16 3. A violation of this section shall be punishable by a civil penalty 17 of up to one thousand dollars for the first offense, and up to two thou- 18 sand five hundred dollars for each subsequent offense. Each day that a 19 violation continues shall constitute a separate and distinct offense. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 21 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 22 signs and billboards erected or maintained on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08226-01-5